Wisconsin, session 2025, SB186.
do enact as follows:SB186,11Section 1. 16.25 (1) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:SB186,2,3216.25 (1) (ag) “Completion service award” means an award described in sub. 3(3) (L).SB186,24Section 2. 16.25 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB186,2,17516.25 (2) The department shall administer a program to provide grants for 6completion service awards to volunteer firefighters, as described in sub. (3) (L), and 7to provide length-of-service awards, described in 26 USC 457 (e) (11), to volunteer 8fire fighters firefighters in municipalities that operate volunteer fire departments 9or that contract with volunteer fire companies organized under ch. 181 or 213, to 10emergency medical responders in any municipality that authorizes emergency 11medical responders to provide emergency medical responder services, and to 12volunteer emergency medical services practitioners in any municipality that 13authorizes volunteer emergency medical services practitioners to provide 14emergency medical technical services in the municipality. To the extent permitted 15by federal law, the department shall administer the program so as to treat the 16length-of-service awards as a tax-deferred benefit under the Internal Revenue 17Code.SB186,318Section 3. 16.25 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB186,3,61916.25 (3) (a) All municipalities that operate volunteer fire departments or 1that contract with a volunteer fire company organized under ch. 181 or 213, all 2municipalities that authorize emergency medical responders to provide emergency 3medical responder services, and all municipalities that authorize volunteer 4emergency medical services practitioners to provide emergency medical technical 5services are eligible to participate in the program with respect to length-of-service 6awards.SB186,47Section 4. 16.25 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB186,3,11816.25 (3) (b) Annual contributions for length-of-service awards in an amount 9determined by the municipality shall be paid by each municipality for each 10volunteer fire fighter firefighter, emergency medical responder, and emergency 11medical services practitioner who provides services for the municipality.SB186,512Section 5. 16.25 (3) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB186,3,191316.25 (3) (c) The municipality may select from among the plans offered by 14individuals or organizations under contract with the department under sub. (4) for 15length-of-service awards for the volunteer fire fighters firefighters, emergency 16medical responders, and emergency medical services practitioners who perform 17services for the municipality. The municipality shall pay the annual contributions 18directly to the individual or organization offering the plan selected by the 19municipality.SB186,620Section 6. 16.25 (3) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB186,4,102116.25 (3) (d) The department shall provide the grants under par. (L) for 22completion service awards, and the department shall provide a match equal to 23twice the amount of all annual municipal contributions paid for length-of-service 1awards for volunteer fire fighters firefighters, emergency medical responders, and 2emergency medical services practitioners up to a state match of $390 per fiscal year, 3other than contributions paid for the purchase of additional years of service under 4par. (e), to be paid from the appropriation account under s. 20.505 (4) (er). This The 5amount for matches for length-of-service awards shall be adjusted annually on July 61 to reflect any changes in the U.S. consumer price index for all urban consumers, 7U.S. city average, as determined by the U.S. department of labor, for the 12-month 8period ending on the preceding December 31. The department shall pay all 9amounts that are matched under this paragraph for length-of-service awards to the 10individuals and organizations offering the plans selected by the municipalities.SB186,711Section 7. 16.25 (3) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB186,4,191216.25 (3) (e) A municipality may purchase additional years of service for 13volunteer fire fighters firefighters, emergency medical responders, and emergency 14medical services practitioners to be used for length-of-service awards. The number 15of additional years of service that may be purchased under this paragraph may not 16exceed the number of years of volunteer fire fighting, emergency medical responder 17service, or emergency medical technical service performed by the volunteer fire 18fighter firefighter, emergency medical responder, or emergency medical services 19practitioner for the municipality.SB186,820Section 8. 16.25 (3) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:SB186,5,62116.25 (3) (f) Except in the case of a volunteer fire fighter firefighter, 22emergency medical responder, or emergency medical services practitioner or the 23beneficiary of a volunteer fire fighter firefighter, emergency medical responder, or 1emergency medical services practitioner eligible for a lump sum under par. (i), a 2vesting period of 10 years of volunteer fire fighting, emergency medical responder 3service, or emergency medical technical service for a municipality shall be required 4before a volunteer fire fighter firefighter, emergency medical responder, or 5emergency medical services practitioner may receive any benefits under the 6program with respect to length-of-service awards.SB186,97Section 9. 16.25 (3) (j) of the statutes is amended to read:SB186,5,15816.25 (3) (j) The account of any volunteer fire fighter firefighter, emergency 9medical responder, or emergency medical services practitioner who has not met all 10of the vesting requirements under the program for a length-of-service award, who 11has not provided volunteer fire fighting, emergency medical responder, or 12emergency medical technical services for a municipality for a period of 12 months or 13more, who does not meet any other program requirement for a length-of-service 14award established by the municipality, and who has not been granted a leave of 15absence by his or her supervisor shall be closed.SB186,1016Section 10. 16.25 (3) (k) of the statutes is amended to read:SB186,5,211716.25 (3) (k) The department shall equitably allocate all moneys in length-of-18service award accounts of volunteer fire fighters firefighters, emergency medical 19responders, and emergency medical services practitioners that have been closed to 20the accounts of volunteer fire fighters firefighters, emergency medical responders, 21and emergency medical services practitioners that have not been forfeited or closed.SB186,1122Section 11. 16.25 (3) (L) of the statutes is created to read:SB186,6,2116.25 (3) (L) The department shall provide grants for completion service 2awards. All of the following apply to the grants awarded under this paragraph:SB186,6,531. A grant awarded under this paragraph shall be used by volunteer fire 4departments and fire companies to make awards to volunteer firefighters of a 5onetime payment of $250 after completion of 60 hours of training.SB186,6,962. For a volunteer fire department or volunteer fire company to be eligible for 7a grant under this paragraph, the municipality in which the department or 8company is organized must, by ordinance, provide payments that match the 9payments under subd. 1.SB186,6,13103. If a volunteer fire department or volunteer fire company receives a grant 11that exceeds the amount of the awards it makes to volunteer firefighters under 12subd. 1. in a calendar year, the department or company shall repay the excess 13money to the department of administration for deposit in the general fund.SB186,6,19144. Six years after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], 15and for 2 years thereafter, on or before December 31, the department shall submit a 16report to the chief clerk of each house of the legislature under s. 13.172 (2) that 17includes the number of individuals who received a grant under this paragraph 18through the date of the report and the number of those individuals who are still 19firefighters in this state as of the date of the report.SB186,1220Section 12. 16.25 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB186,7,32116.25 (4) (b) The department may contract with any individual or 22organization in the private sector that seeks to provide administrative services and 23investment plans required for the program for length-of-service awards, other than 1services funded from the appropriation under s. 20.505 (4) (ec), if the individual or 2organization fulfills the requirements and has the qualifications established by the 3department under par. (a). Section 16.72 (2) (b) does not apply to any such contract.SB186,7,44